Massachusetts, session 194th, H3698.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following section:-
Section 64. Vehicles 25 Years or Older; Registration Requirements
(a) For the purposes of this section, a "Kei car" shall be defined as a vehicle primarily
manufactured in Japan, with the following specifications: a length no longer than 11 feet, a width
no greater than 4.9 feet, a height no taller than 6.6 feet, and an engine displacement no larger
than 660cc.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards" shall refer
to the federal regulations that allow motor vehicles and motor vehicle equipment, which are 25
of 2

years or older from the date of manufacture, to be imported into the United States and registered
as outlined in 49 C.F.R. §§ 571 and 591, provided they were originally manufactured to meet the
safety standards of their country of origin.
(c) The Massachusetts Registry of Motor Vehicles shall honor the Federal Motor Vehicle
Safety Standards and shall register all vehicles 25 years or older as of the date of manufacture
that were imported in compliance with 49 C.F.R. § 591, including vehicles classified as "Kei
cars."
(d) The Registry of Motor Vehicles shall develop and implement an updated policy for
the registration of Kei cars and shall honor inspection stickers for all automobiles imported in
compliance with 49 C.F.R. § 591.
of 2